Hawaii statutes.
§37-78 Schedule of implementation. The
governor shall submit to the legislature:

(1) At the regular session of 1975, and every
odd-numbered year's session thereafter, the program memoranda described in
section 37-70.

(2) At the regular session of 1975, and every
odd-numbered year's session thereafter, the governor's proposed state budget
and six-year program and financial plan. [L 1970, c 185, §17; ren L 1972, c 72,
§3; am L 1974, c 219, §9; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next